Idaho, session 2025, H0130.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-602D, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-602D. PROPERTY EXEMPT FROM TAXATION -- CERTAIN HOSPITALS. (1) For
the purposes of this section, "hospital" means a hospital as defined by chap-
ter 13, title 39, Idaho Code, and includes one (1) or more acute care, out-
reach, satellite, outpatient, ancillary or support facilities of such hos-
pital whether or not any such individual facility would independently sat-
isfy the definition of hospital. nonprofit medical clinics as defined in
section 39-1319, Idaho Code, and facilities designated by the centers for
medicare and medicaid services of the federal department of health and human
services as a critical access hospital or a rural emergency hospital.
(2) The following property is exempt from taxation: the real property
owned and personal property, including medical equipment, owned or leased
by a nonprofit hospital corporation or, a county hospital, a critical access
hospital, a rural emergency hospital, or a hospital district that is oper-
ated as a hospital and the necessary grounds used therewith. and personal
property, including medical equipment, owned or leased by a nonprofit hospi-
tal, a county hospital, or a hospital district that is located and used in a
hospital.
(3) If real property, not currently exempt from taxation, is being pre-
pared for use as a hospital, the value of the bare land only shall be taxed
while the property is being prepared for use as a hospital. All improvements
to and construction on the real property, while it is being prepared for use
as a hospital, shall be exempt from taxation. For purposes of this section,
property is being "prepared for use as a hospital" if the corporation has be-
gun construction of a hospital project as evidenced by obtaining a building
permit that will, on completion, qualify such property for an exemption and,
as of the assessment date, has not abandoned the construction. Construc-
tion shall not be considered abandoned if it has been delayed by causes and
circumstances beyond the corporation's control or when delay is caused by
an event that has occurred in the absence of the corporation's willful ne-
glect or intentional acts, omissions or practices engaged in by the corpora-
tion for the purpose of impeding progress. Notwithstanding the foregoing,
in no event shall improvements to property that is being prepared for use as
a hospital qualify for an exemption from ad valorem property tax under this
subsection for more than three (3) consecutive tax years; upon completion of
construction and obtaining a certificate of occupancy, the entire real prop-


erty shall be exempt from taxation if the corporation meets the requirements
of subsection (4) of this section; provided, property already exempt or el-
igible for exemption shall not be affected by the provisions of this subsec-
tion.
(4) (3) The corporation In order to receive a property tax exemption, a
nonprofit hospital must show that the hospital:
(a) Is Provide documentation showing that it is organized as a non-
profit corporation pursuant to chapter 30, title 30, Idaho Code, or
pursuant to equivalent laws in its state of incorporation;
(b) Has Provide documentation showing that it has received an exemp-
tion from taxation from the internal revenue service pursuant to sec-
tion 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.;
(c) Provide a copy of its internal revenue service form 990 schedule H;
and
(d) For hospitals that are not facilities designated by the centers for
medicare and medicaid services of the federal department of health and
human services as critical access hospitals:
(i) Provide a copy of its most recent community health needs as-
sessment and its adopted implementation strategy to meet the com-
munity health needs identified in the assessment as required by
section 26 U.S.C. 501(r);
(ii) Provide a copy of its written financial assistance policy and
policy related to emergency medical care as required by section 26
U.S.C. 501(r);
(iii) Limit the amount charged for emergency or other medically
necessary care provided to individuals eligible for assistance
under its financial assistance policy pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
501(r);
(iv) Make reasonable efforts to determine whether an individual
is eligible for its financial assistance policy before engaging
in extraordinary collection actions pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 501(r);
and
(v) Provide a general public benefit to the county in which it is
located as measured by its annual community benefit report filed
with the board of equalization.
(5) The board of equalization shall grant an exemption to the property
of: (a) a county hospital; (b) a hospital district; or (c) any hospital cor-
poration meeting the criteria provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) (4) If a nonprofit hospital corporation uses property for business
purposes from which a revenue is derived that is not directly related to
the hospital corporation's nonprofit hospital's exempt purposes, then the
property shall be assessed and taxed as any other property. If property is
used in part by a nonprofit hospital corporation for such purposes, then
the assessor shall determine the value of the entire property and the value
of the part used that is not directly related to the hospital corporation's
nonprofit hospital's exempt purposes. If the value of the part that is not
directly related to the hospital corporation's nonprofit hospital's exempt
purposes is determined to be three percent (3%) or less than the value of the
entire property, then the property shall remain exempt. If the value of the
part that is not directly related to the hospital corporation's nonprofit


hospital's exempt purposes is determined to be more than three percent (3%)
of the value of the entire property, then the assessor shall assess the pro-
portionate part of the property, including the value of the real estate used
for such purposes.
(7) (5) A nonprofit hospital corporation issued an exemption from prop-
erty taxation pursuant to this section and operating a hospital having one
hundred fifty (150) or more patient beds shall prepare a community benefits
report to be filed with the board of equalization by December 31 of each year.
The report shall include audited information and shall itemize the:
(a) The nonprofit hospital's amount of unreimbursed services for the
prior year (including from patients who are financially unable to pay
for the cost of the care they received, charity care, bad debt, and un-
derreimbursed care covered through government programs); special
(b) Special services and programs the hospital provides below its ac-
tual cost; donated
(c) Donated time, funds, subsidies, and in-kind services; additions
(d) Additions to capital such as physical plant and equipment; and in-
dication of the
(e) The methodology used to determine how much the cost of care exceeds
government reimbursements for those services; and
(f) The process the hospital has used to determine general community
needs that coincide with the hospital's mission. The report shall be
provided as a matter of community information. Neither the submission
of the report nor the contents shall be a basis for the approval or de-
nial of a corporation's property tax exemption.
SECTION 2. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2026.